Washington statutes.
RCW 19.134.080

Damages—Attorneys' fees.

(1) Any person injured by a violation of this chapter may bring any action for recovery of damages. Judgment shall be entered for actual damages, plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. In the case of an action by a consumer, damages shall be awarded in an amount not less than the amount paid by the consumer to the credit services organization. An award may also be entered for punitive damages.

(2) The remedies provided under this chapter are in addition to any other procedures or remedies for any violation or conduct provided for in any other law.

[ 2023 c 144 s 9; 1986 c 218 s 9.]